Hawaii statutes.
§123-3 Commander in chief; powers of.
The governor as commander in chief of the militia of the State, may prescribe
the organization for the naval militia of the State, in such manner and form as
to make the organization conform to the requirements for the naval militia
under the laws of the United States. For that purpose the governor may alter,
divide, annex, consolidate, disband, organize, or recognize the whole or any
unit or part of the naval militia, so as to conform to any organization system,
drill, instruction, or discipline which may be prescribed by law for the
organization, government and discipline of the naval militia of the United
States, and for that purpose the number of commissioned, warrant or petty
officers, of any grade or rating in any organization of the naval militia, may
be increased or diminished, and the designation and grade or rating of any
officers may be altered to the extent necessary to secure uniformity. [L 1915,
c 151, §3; RL 1925, §273; RL 1935, §7862; RL 1945, §13082; RL 1955, §354-3; HRS
§123-3; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next